Massachusetts, session 194th, H53.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. To provide for a program of transportation development and improvements,
the sums set forth in sections 2 and 2A for the several purposes, and subject to the conditions
specified in this act, are hereby made available, subject to the laws regulating the disbursement
of public funds. The sums made available in this act shall be in addition to any amounts
previously appropriated or made available for these purposes.
SECTION 2.
MASSACHUSETTS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Highway Division
6122-2627 For the construction and reconstruction of municipal ways as described in
clause (b) of the second paragraph of section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws; provided, that
of 5

a city or town shall comply with the procedures established by the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation; provided further, that a city or town may expend, without further appropriation,
for these projects amounts not in excess of the amount provided to the city or town under this
item upon preliminary notice of such amount, which shall be provided by the department to the
city or town not later than March 1 of each year; and provided further, that the commonwealth
shall reimburse funds to a city or town under this item, subject to the availability of funds as
provided in section 9G of chapter 29 of the General Laws, within 30 days after receipt by the
department of a request for reimbursement from the city or town; provided further, that the
department shall expend up to $500,000,000 for construction and reconstruction of municipal
ways which shall be allocated to municipalities based on local road mileage under procedures
established by the department; provided further, that the department shall encourage long-term
capital plans to be developed by a city or town describing how they will use this funding; and
provided further, that the city or town shall provide to the department its certification by the city
or town that actual expenses have been incurred on projects eligible for funding under this item
and that the work has been completed to the satisfaction of the city or town according to the
specifications of the project plan, and in compliance with applicable laws and procedures
established by the department..................................................... $1,500,000,000
SECTION 2A.
MASSACHUSETTS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Highway Division
6121-2617 For the bridge and pavement lifecycle asset management program, including
but not limited to design, construction and repair of, or improvements to, non-federally aided
of 5

roadway and bridge projects and for the nonparticipating portion of federally-aided projects, and
for the construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, repair and improvement of pavement and
surface conditions on non-federally aided roadways, including, but not limited to, state numbered
routes and municipal roadways; provided, that expenditures from this item may include the costs
of engineering, design, permitting, climate change adaptation and resilience and other services
essential to projects under this item; provided further, that funds may be expended from this item
for matching grants to municipalities related to repair of surface conditions on paved and
unpaved public ways; provided further, that the department may use these funds for improving
the condition of bicycle and pedestrian accommodations related to such roadway, bridge,
pavement and resurfacing projects; and provided further, that the department shall consider
lifecycle asset management and resilient design with respect to projects under this
item..................................................... $500,000,000
6121-2627 For a program of culvert and small bridge modernization, reconstruction,
removal, repair, replacement, and resilience improvements to culverts and small bridges with a
span of 20 feet or less under procedures established by the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation in consultation with the secretary of energy and environmental affairs; provided,
that expenditures from this item may include the costs of engineering, design, permitting, climate
change adaptation and resilience and other services essential to projects under this item; and
provided further, that funds may be expended from this item for matching grants to
municipalities for municipally-owned small bridges and
culverts..................................................... $200,000,000
6121-2637 For a program of transportation capital projects to ease congestion and
improve safety in Massachusetts; provided, that expenditures from this item may include
of 5

intersection improvements, rail grade crossings, bicycle infrastructure and shared use paths,
pedestrian walkways and improvements, accessibility improvements, traffic signals and
technology, ADA compliant sidewalks and crossings, roadway reconstruction and repairs and
other capital investments to alleviate road congestion and improve road, walking, biking
conditions throughout Massachusetts..................................................... $185,000,000
SECTION 3. To meet the expenditures necessary in carrying out section 2, the state
treasurer shall, upon request of the governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an
amount to be specified by the governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate,
$1,500,000,000. All bonds issued by the commonwealth as aforesaid shall be designated on their
face, Commonwealth Transportation Improvement Act of 2025, and shall be issued for a
maximum term of years, not exceeding 30 years, as the governor may recommend to the general
court under section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution. All such bonds
shall be payable not later than June 30, 2065, pursuant to said section 3 of said Article LXII. All
interest and payments on account of principal on these obligations shall be payable from the
General Fund or the Commonwealth Transportation Fund.
SECTION 4. To meet the expenditures necessary in carrying out section 2A, the state
treasurer shall, upon request of the governor, issue and sell bonds of the commonwealth in an
amount to be specified by the governor from time to time but not exceeding, in the aggregate,
$885,000,000. All bonds issued by the commonwealth as aforesaid shall be designated on their
face, Commonwealth Transportation Improvement Act of 2025, and shall be issued for a
maximum term of years, not exceeding 30 years, as the governor may recommend to the general
court under section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution. All such bonds
shall be payable not later than June 30, 2065, pursuant to said section 3 of said Article LXII. All
of 5

interest and payments on account of principal on these obligations shall be payable from the
General Fund or the Commonwealth Transportation Fund.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, bonds and
interest thereon issued under sections 2 and 2A shall be general obligations of the
commonwealth; provided, however, that any bonds issued by the state treasurer under said
sections, shall, upon the request of the governor, be issued as special obligation bonds pursuant
to section 2O of chapter 29 of the General Laws; provided further, that in deciding whether to
request the issuance of particular bonds as special obligations, the governor shall take into
account: (i) generally prevailing financial market conditions; (ii) the impact of each approach on
the overall capital financing plans and needs of the commonwealth; (iii) any ratings assigned to
outstanding bonds of the commonwealth and any ratings expected to be assigned by any
nationally-recognized credit rating agency to the bonds proposed to be issued; and (iv) any
applicable provisions of a trust agreement or credit enhancement agreement entered into pursuant
to said section 2O of said chapter 29. All interest and payments on account of obligations issued
under this section as special obligation bonds pursuant to said section 2O of said chapter 29 shall
be payable from the Commonwealth Transportation Fund, established in section 2ZZZ of said
chapter 29, solely in accordance with said section 2O of said chapter 29, and such bonds shall
not be included in the computation of outstanding bonds for purposes of the limit imposed by the
second paragraph of section 60A of said chapter 29, nor shall debt service with respect to such
bonds be included in the computation of the limit imposed by section 60B of said chapter 29.
of 5